Massachusetts, session 194th, S2269.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
1 SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 40 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting
2 after section 1B the following section:-
3 Section 1C. “Smart Residential Solar Permitting Platform”, software or a combination of
4 software that automates plan review, automatically produces code-compliant approvals, accepts
5 online payments for permitting fees if permitting fees are levied, and instantly issues permits and
6 permit revisions for residential photovoltaic systems upon online submission of permitting fee
7 payments, if permitting fees are levied, and a code-compliant application. The Smart Residential
8 Solar Permitting Platform shall be available for solar photovoltaic systems up to the maximum
9 capacity allowed with a 200-amp main service disconnect that provides electrical power to a one-
10 or two-family dwelling, and that may include an energy storage system, a main panel upgrade, or
11 a main breaker derate.
1 of 11

12 SECTION 2. Said chapter 40 is hereby amended by inserting after section 69 the
13 following sections:-
14 Section 70. (a) Not later than July 1, 2027, the Permit Granting Authority shall allow for
15 electronic submission of the permit application and associated documentation for the installation
16 of a residential solar photovoltaic system, that may include an energy storage system, a main
17 panel upgrade, and/or a main breaker derate. All required permitting documentation and forms
18 shall be published on the Permit Granting Authority’s publicly accessible internet website. The
19 Permit Granting Authority shall authorize an electronic signature for the permit application and
20 other documentation in lieu of a wet signature by an applicant. Electronic submission, including
21 online payment of associated permitting fees, shall be offered through either an online portal
22 available on the website of the Permit Granting Authority or via electronic mail to a dedicated
23 account that shall be capable of receiving permit applications.
24 (b) Upon submission of required permit application documents, the application shall be
25 deemed complete if, after five business days have elapsed, the Permit Granting Authority has not
26 issued a written correction notice detailing all deficiencies in the application and identifying
27 additional information explicitly necessary for the Permit Granting Authority to complete a
28 review.
29 (c) An application shall be deemed approved and the applicant may begin installation if
30 ten business days after the application was deemed complete has elapsed and the following are
31 true:
32 (1) the Permit Granting Authority has not administratively approved the application.
33 (2) the Permit Granting Authority has not denied the permit.
2 of 11

34 (e) A Permit Granting Authority may use a Smart Residential Solar Permitting Platform
35 to satisfy the requirements of this section. An applicant may begin installation after the issuance
36 of a permit from the platform.
37 Section 71.
38 (a) Not later than July 1, 2027, the Permit Granting Authority for a municipality with a
39 population greater than 5,000 people, that is not exempt pursuant to paragraph (f), shall
40 implement a Smart Residential Solar Permitting Platform. The Permit Granting Authority shall
41 anticipate that the Smart Residential Solar Permitting Platform will have the capability to process
42 at least 75 percent of residential solar applications on existing construction submitted to
43 municipalities in the Commonwealth of Massachusetts.
44 (b) Municipalities that adopt a Smart Residential Solar Permitting Platform pursuant to
45 subsection (a) shall, for a solar photovoltaic system approved by such a platform, not require
46 manual review at any time during the permitting and inspection processes, including but not
47 limited to, before issuing a permit or before conducting or finalizing the inspection.
48 (c) Subsection (b) does not preclude an inspector from examining construction
49 documents.
50 (d) (1) Municipalities shall submit compliance reports to the Massachusetts Department
51 of Energy Resources when the municipality is in compliance with subsection (a). The reports
52 shall be submitted within 60 days of the municipality becoming compliant with subsection (a).
53 The Massachusetts Department of Energy Resources may set guidelines for these reports.
3 of 11

54 (2) If the municipality has a resolution or ordinance in effect pursuant to subsection (f),
55 the report shall include the resolution or ordinance.
56 (3) If the municipality does not have a resolution or ordinance in effect pursuant to
57 subsection (f), the report shall include:
58 (i) Date of compliance;
59 (ii) Software used for compliance;
60 (iii) Confirmation that the municipality is:
61 (A) using a Smart Residential Solar Permitting Platform to issue permits instantly and
62 issue permit revisions instantly for residential solar photovoltaic systems; and
63 (B) not requiring manual review at any time during the permitting and inspection
64 processes, including but not limited to, before issuing a permit or before conducting or finalizing
65 the inspection for solar photovoltaic systems approved by the Smart Residential Solar Permitting
66 Platform.
67 (iv) Explanation for why the municipality anticipates the Smart Residential Solar
68 Permitting Platform has the capability to process at least 75 percent of the residential solar
69 photovoltaic permit applications on existing construction submitted to municipalities in the
70 commonwealth.
71 (A) Municipalities may provide explanations that are based on, but are not necessarily
72 limited to, statements from the provider of the Smart Residential Solar Permitting Platform.
4 of 11

73 (4) The Massachusetts Department of Energy Resources may determine if the
74 municipality’s report of compliance is accurate, may make the findings publicly available, and
75 may take action at the Massachusetts Department of Energy Resources’ discretion to encourage
76 and enforce compliance with subsection (a).
77 (e) (1) Municipalities shall submit annual reports to the Massachusetts Department of
78 Energy Resources on the usage of the Smart Residential Solar Permitting Platform.
79 Municipalities shall annually report to the Massachusetts Department of Energy Resources by
80 April 1st each year, covering the previous calendar year, starting on April 1, 2028. This annual
81 reporting requirement shall become inoperative on April 2, 2037. The Massachusetts Department
82 of Energy Resources may set guidelines for these reports.
83 (2) If the municipality has a resolution or ordinance in effect pursuant to subparagraph
84 (f), the report shall include the resolution or ordinance.
85 (3) If the municipality does not have a resolution or ordinance in effect pursuant to
86 subparagraph (f), the report shall include:
87 (i) Number of permits issued through the Smart Residential Solar Permitting Platform
88 and relevant characteristics of those systems;
89 (ii) Number of residential photovoltaic solar permits issued by means other than the
90 Smart Residential Solar Permitting Platform and relevant characteristics of those systems;
91 (iii) Software used for compliance;
92 (iv) Confirmation that the municipality is:
5 of 11

93 (A) using a Smart Residential Solar Permitting Platform to issue permits instantly and
94 issue permit revisions instantly for residential solar photovoltaic systems; and
95 (B) not requiring manual review at any time during the permitting and inspection
96 processes, including but not limited to, before issuing a permit or before conducting or finalizing
97 the inspection for permits and permit revisions issued by the Smart Residential Solar Permitting
98 Platform.
99 (v) Plan to increase usage of the Smart Residential Solar Permitting Platform if fewer
100 than 75 percent of residential solar photovoltaic permits are issued through the Smart Residential
101 Solar Permitting Platform on existing construction.
102 (4) The Massachusetts Department of Energy Resources may determine if the
103 municipality’s report of compliance is accurate, may make the findings publicly available, and
104 may take action at the Massachusetts Department of Energy Resources’ discretion to encourage
105 and enforce compliance with subsection (a).
106 (f) (1) The Permit Granting Authority for a municipality with a population greater than
107 5,000 people is exempt from paragraph (a) if the aforementioned municipality makes a written
108 finding and adopts a resolution or ordinance. The resolution or ordinance shall stay in effect for
109 no more than one year. Within the last three months of the effective end date for the resolution or
110 ordinance, the municipality may adopt an additional resolution or ordinance to extend the
111 exemption from paragraph (a) for an additional year. The municipality may continue to adopt
112 resolutions or ordinances extending the exemption for an additional year so long as each
113 resolution or ordinance is adopted within the last three months of the effective end date of the
114 resolution or ordinance.
6 of 11

115 (2) Each resolution or ordinance adopted pursuant to this subdivision shall include both
116 of the following:
117 (i) A determination that the Permit Granting Authority is unable to adopt a Smart
118 Residential Solar Permitting Platform due to unique technical, climactic, geological,
119 seismological, or topographical conditions, including a description of those unique conditions.
120 (ii) A plan for the Permit Granting Authority to approve all residential photovoltaic
121 permit applications or issue a written correction notice within five business days. The plan shall
122 include the time it has taken for the Permit Granting Authority to approve residential
123 photovoltaic permit applications or issue written correction notices in the past year, and, if the
124 Permit Granting Authority has previously taken more than five business days to approve a
125 residential solar photovolatic permit application or issue a written correction notice in the past
126 year, an explanation of how the plan would address the delays.
127 (g) A municipality shall self-certify its compliance with this section when applying for
128 funding from the Massachusetts Department of Energy Resources after the applicable date in
129 subdivision (a). Municipalities that fail to comply with this section may be ineligible for funding
130 opportunities offered by the Massachusetts Department of Energy Resources. The Massachusetts
131 Department of Energy Resources may, at its sole discretion, condition or deny a municipality or
132 county direct funding from any of its programs if the municipality is not in compliance with this
133 section.
134 Section 71.
135 (a) On or before July 1, 2027, municipalities with a population of more than 5,000
136 residents shall provide an option for remote inspections via recorded video or photo that can be
7 of 11

137 submitted electronically for projects permitted by the Smart Residential Solar Permitting
138 Platform. These inspections shall be offered at no greater cost, and shall be available with no
139 greater delay, than in-person inspections.
140 (b) Municipalities shall require no more than one inspection for projects permitted by the
141 Smart Residential Solar Permitting Platform unless the first inspection was failed.
142 (c) An electric distribution company shall not require inspections additional to the
143 inspection performed by the Permit Granting Authority by the electric distribution company or
144 any other entity as a precondition to granting the customer permission to operate.
145 SECTION 3. Section 6 of chapter 62 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
146 Official Edition, is hereby amended by by striking out subsection (d) and inserting in place
147 thereof the following subsection:-
148 (d) any owner or tenant of residential property located in the commonwealth who is not a
149 dependent of another taxpayer and who occupies said property as his principal residence, shall be
150 allowed a credit equal to 15 per cent of the net expenditure for a renewable energy source
151 property or seven thousand five hundred dollars, whichever is lesser; provided, however, that in
152 the case of a newly constructed residence the credit shall be available to the original
153 owner/occupant. Any taxpayer entitled to this credit for any taxable year, the amount of which
154 exceeds his total tax due for the then current taxable year, may carry over the excess amount, as
155 reduced from year to year, and apply it to his tax liability for any one or more of the next
156 succeeding three taxable years; provided, however, that in no taxable year may the amount of the
157 credit allowed exceed the total tax due of the taxpayer for the relevant taxable year. For taxable
158 years beginning on or after January first, two thousand twenty-seven, if the amount of the credit
8 of 11

159 allowable under this subsection shall exceed the taxpayer's tax liability for such year, and the
160 taxpayer meets the definition of low to moderate income, as defined in section 38d of chapter
161 121b in the general laws, or resides in an environmental justice population, as defined in section
162 62 of chapter 30 of the general laws, the excess shall be treated as an overpayment of tax to be
163 credited or refunded, provided, however, that no interest shall be paid thereon. Joint owners of a
164 residential property shall share any credit available to the property under this subsection in the
165 same proportion as their ownership interest.
166 SECTION 4. Section 6 of chapter 25A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
167 amended inserting after subsection (14) the following subsection:-
168 (15) develop and promulgate, in consultation with the state board of building regulation
169 and standards, the department of transportation, and local zoning and planning boards, a
170 requirement that parking lots 16,000 square feet or larger which are constructed or significantly
171 renovated on or after January 1, 2028 must install a solar canopy. The department may establish
172 exemption criteria from the requirements of this section. Such criteria may include insufficient
173 solar energy generating potential and the installation of a solar energy system elsewhere on the
174 property. The department may allow exemptions from the requirements of this section for
175 affordable housing developments, after consulting with affordable housing developers and
176 operators, community development corporations, organizations that represent affordable housing
177 residents, and other stakeholders.
178 SECTION 5. Chapter 164 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
179 section 1K the following section:-
180 Section 1L.
9 of 11

181 (1) For the purposes of climate resiliency and mitigation, reliability, and encouragement
182 of installation of distributed electricity generation and storage capacity, no right to exclusive
183 service or franchise established within Section 1B or elsewhere in this chapter shall prevent a
184 municipality, or agencies of the commonwealth or private electric customers in coordination
185 with a municipality, within an electric or gas company’s service territory, from:
186 (i) establishing an energy microgrid or district energy system;
187 (ii) sharing electric generation or storage resources among facilities that are contiguous
188 and owned by the same utility customer, irrespective of the number of electric meters installed at
189 such facilities; or
190 (iii) using public rights of way to conduct electrical conduit or other energy resources
191 point to point where the municipality deems there is benefit from sharing energy resources.
192 SECTION 6. Chapter 164 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
193 section 142, as so appearing, the following new section:-
194 Section 142A.
195 (1) The Department shall direct each electric distribution company to update their
196 interconnection tariff to require a process to determine whether a project application being
197 considered for interconnection within a Group Study has sufficient available hosting capacity
198 when considered as an individual project, and to grant Interconnection Service Agreements to
199 those projects with sufficient hosting capacity.
200 (2) An inverter-based generating facility with a generating capacity of 25 kW or less shall
201 be allowed to apply for interconnection under the simplified interconnection process established
10 of 11

202 by the Department. The Department shall direct the distribution companies to file updated tariffs
203 no later than 180 days after this act is enacted. The distribution companies shall impose no study
204 or transformer fees for behind-the-meter simplified interconnection applications of less than 25
205 kilowatts.
206 (3) The Department shall develop, in consultation with the electric distribution
207 companies, a common application for interconnection to the distribution grid, regardless of
208 compensation type or program.
209 SECTION 7. Section 6 of chapter 64H of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
210 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out subsection (dd) and inserting in place thereof
211 the following subsection:-
212 (dd) Sales of equipment directly relating to any solar, energy storage, windpowered; or
213 heat pump system, which is being utilized as a primary or auxiliary power system for the purpose
214 of heating or otherwise supplying energy needs in the commonwealth.
215 SECTION 8. Section 139 of chapter 164 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
216 amended by striking out, in lines 137 and 138, the words, “that are not net metering facilities of a
217 municipality or other governmental entity.”
218 SECTION 9. Said section 139 of said chapter 164, as so appearing, is hereby further
219 amended by striking out, in lines 145 and 146, the words, “in the second sentence by striking the
220 words “that are not net metering facilities of a municipality or other governmental entity.”
11 of 11